Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Chapter 12 Income Tax

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

71 Am. Jur. 2d State and Local Taxation §§ 382 to 545.

47A C.J.S. Internal Revenue §§ 12 to 493; 85 C.J.S. Taxation §§ 1693 to 1782.

§ 39-12-101.
Preemption by state.

The state of Wyoming does hereby preempt for itself the field of imposing and levying income taxes, earning taxes, or any other form of tax based on wages or other income and no county, city, town or other political subdivision shall have the right to impose, levy or collect such taxes.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to full credit for sales, use and ad valorem taxes paid against income tax liability, see art. 15, § 18, Wyo. Const.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Divorce and separation: consideration of tax consequences in distribution of marital property, 9 ALR5th 568.

Construction and application of 26 USC § 6701 imposing civil penalties on persons aiding and abetting understatement of tax liability, 114 ALR Fed 377.

Who is an “income tax return preparer” under 26 USC § 7701(a)(36), 132 ALR Fed 265.